Utah statutes.
11-36-302.   Impact fees -- Expenditure.
(1)  A local political subdivision may expend impact fees only for a system
improvement:
(a)  identified in the capital facilities plan; and
(b)  for the specific public facility type for which the fee was collected.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a local political
subdivision shall expend or encumber the impact fees for a permissible use
within six years of their receipt.
(b)  A local political subdivision may hold the fees for longer than six years
if it identifies, in writing:
(i)  an extraordinary and compelling reason why the fees should be held longer
than six years; and
(ii)  an absolute date by which the fees will be expended.
